Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,262
Safety glass, defined.

For purposes of section 60-6,263, safety glass shall mean any product composed of glass or such other or similar products as will successfully withstand discoloration due to exposure to sunlight or abnormal temperatures over an extended period of time and is so manufactured, fabricated, or treated as substantially to prevent or reduce in comparison with ordinary sheet glass or plate glass, when struck or broken, the likelihood of injury to persons.

Laws 1933, c. 101, § 3, p. 413;

Laws 1937, c. 145, § 3, p. 554;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1196;

R.S.1943, § 39-7,102;

Laws 1972, LB 1058, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1972, § 39-7,102;

Laws 1987, LB 224, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,156;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 358.

The enactment of this section did not abrogate existing municipal ordinances on the same subject and did not deprive municipalities of the power to legislate thereon in the future. State v. Hauser, 137 Neb. 138, 288 N.W. 518 (1939).